Wyoming, session 2026, HB0147.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 39-11-105(a)(xlvi) by creating a new
subparagraph (D) is amended to read:

39-11-105. Exemptions.

(a) The following property is exempt from property
taxation:
HB0147

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0402

(xlvi) A portion of a single family residential
structure and the associated improved land as a homeowner
tax exemption as provided in this paragraph. The following
shall apply to this exemption:

(D) This paragraph is repealed on the date
the secretary of state certifies to the department of
revenue that the voters have approved an initiative
implementing a homeowner's property tax exemption and the
exemption is enacted into law.

Section 2. If the secretary of state certifies that
the voters have approved an initiative implementing a
homeowner's property tax exemption and that exemption is
effective for the tax year beginning January 1, 2027, the
exemption under W.S. 39-11-105(a)(xlvi) shall not apply for
the tax year beginning January 1, 2027.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0147